Utah statutes.
4-24-16.   Transportation of cattle and calves between brand inspection districts -- Brand inspection required -- Exception -- No fee for reinspection -- Application for brand inspection -- Time and place of inspection -- Applicability to horses and mules.

(1)  A person may not transport any cattle or calves from a point within a brand inspection district to a point outside the district, except as provided in Subsection (2), until the cattle or calves have been brand inspected, unless the department approves their transport subject to brand inspection at some point designated along the transport route. A brand inspection fee is not required to be paid upon reinspection of cattle or calves being transported between districts from a summer or winter range or pasture if the cattle or calves were brand inspected in the district of origin.  Before transport from one district to another, the owner or person responsible for the transport shall apply to the department to inspect the brands and marks of the animals to be moved. The application shall state the time and place where the animals may be inspected.  Upon receipt of an application for brand inspection, the department shall conduct the inspection at the time and place specified in the application or at such other time and place as the department approves.

(2)  Cattle or calves may be transported between brand inspection districts without brand inspection if they are destined for a livestock market in this state.

(3)  Horses and mules may move within the state without a brand inspection, but a brand inspection is required on a change of ownership or to leave this state.

